Utah statutes.
17-27a-504.   Temporary land use regulations.
(1) (a)  A county legislative body may, without prior consideration of or
recommendation from the planning commission, enact an ordinance establishing a
temporary land use regulation for any part or all of the area within the
county if:
(i)  the legislative body makes a finding of compelling, countervailing public
interest; or
(ii)  the area is unregulated.
(b)  A temporary land use regulation under Subsection (1)(a) may prohibit or
regulate the erection, construction, reconstruction, or alteration of any
building or structure or any subdivision approval.
(c)  A temporary land use regulation under Subsection (1)(a) may not impose an
impact fee or other financial requirement on building or development.
(2)  The legislative body shall establish a period of limited effect for the
ordinance not to exceed six months.
(3) (a)  A legislative body may, without prior planning commission
consideration or recommendation, enact an ordinance establishing a temporary
land use regulation prohibiting construction, subdivision approval, and other
development activities within an area that is the subject of an Environmental
Impact Statement or a Major Investment Study examining the area as a proposed
highway or transportation corridor.
(b)  A regulation under Subsection (3)(a):
(i)  may not exceed six months in duration;
(ii)  may be renewed, if requested by the Transportation Commission created
under Section 72-1-301, for up to two additional six-month periods by
ordinance enacted before the expiration of the previous regulation; and
(iii)  notwithstanding Subsections (3)(b)(i) and (ii), is effective only as
long as the Environmental Impact Statement or Major Investment Study is in
progress.
